Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0167.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 236. (1) Subject to the conditions set forth in this article, the amounts listed in this section are appropriated for higher education for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, 2026, from the funds indicated in this section. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this section and sections 236d and section 236j: (a) The gross appropriation is $2,324,292,600.00. $2,412,322,700.00. After deducting total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers in the amount of $0.00, the adjusted gross appropriation is $2,324,292,600.00.$2,412,322,700.00. (b) The sources of the adjusted gross appropriation described in subdivision (a) are as follows: (i) Total federal revenues, $3,200,000.00. (ii) Total local revenues, $0.00. (iii) Total private revenues, $0.00. (iv) Total other state restricted revenues, $461,668,300.00.$602,177,700.00. (v) State general fund/general purpose money, $1,859,424,300.00.$1,806,945,000.00. (c) The totals and subtotals reflected in subdivisions (a) and (b) do not include amounts appropriated under subsection (7)(f) or (8)(b) to avoid duplicating totals of amounts appropriated in this section and section 236j. (2) Amounts appropriated for public universities are as follows: (a) The appropriation for Central Michigan University is $96,833,700.00, $93,819,600.00 for operations, $1,407,300.00 for operations increase, and $1,606,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$99,792,300.00, $95,226,900.00 for operations, $2,885,000.00 for operations increase, and $1,680,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (b) The appropriation for Eastern Michigan University is $84,381,000.00, $82,738,700.00 for operations, $1,241,100.00 for operations increase, and $401,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$86,936,900.00, $83,979,800.00 for operations, $2,544,200.00 for operations increase, and $412,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (c) The appropriation for Ferris State University is $60,548,400.00, $58,932,300.00 for operations, $884,000.00 for operations increase, and $732,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$62,426,800.00, $59,816,300.00 for operations, $1,812,200.00 for operations increase, and $798,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (d) The appropriation for Grand Valley State University is $98,876,100.00, $96,111,200.00 for operations, $1,441,700.00 for operations increase, and $1,323,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$101,727,400.00, $97,552,900.00 for operations, $2,955,400.00 for operations increase, and $1,219,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (e) The appropriation for Lake Superior State University is $15,838,800.00, $14,251,800.00 for operations, $213,800.00 for operations increase, and $1,373,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$16,351,000.00, $14,465,600.00 for operations, $438,300.00 for operations increase, and $1,447,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (f) The appropriation for Michigan State University is $396,479,600.00, $316,765,400.00 for operations, $4,751,500.00 for operations increase, $2,143,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $39,096,200.00 for MSU AgBioResearch, and $33,723,400.00 for MSU Extension.$408,791,900.00, $321,516,900.00 for operations, $9,740,500.00 for operations increase, $2,508,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $40,280,600.00 for MSU AgBioResearch, and $34,745,100.00 for MSU Extension. (g) The appropriation for Michigan Technological University is $55,245,300.00, $53,658,800.00 for operations, $804,900.00 for operations increase, and $781,600.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$56,845,600.00, $54,463,700.00 for operations, $1,650,000.00 for operations increase, and $731,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (h) The appropriation for Northern Michigan University is $54,263,000.00, $52,069,300.00 for operations, $781,000.00 for operations increase, and $1,412,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$55,869,200.00, $52,850,300.00 for operations, $1,601,100.00 for operations increase, and $1,417,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (i) The appropriation for Oakland University is $73,327,600.00, $71,957,000.00 for operations, $1,079,400.00 for operations increase, and $291,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$75,574,300.00, $73,036,400.00 for operations, $2,212,700.00 for operations increase, and $325,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (j) The appropriation for Saginaw Valley State University is $34,394,500.00, $33,690,600.00 for operations, $505,400.00 for operations increase, and $198,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$35,415,000.00, $34,196,000.00 for operations, $1,036,000.00 for operations increase, and $183,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (k) The appropriation for University of Michigan ? Ann Arbor is $362,128,600.00, $355,278,300.00 for operations, $5,329,000.00 for operations increase, and $1,521,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$373,432,700.00, $360,607,300.00 for operations, $10,924,800.00 for operations increase, and $1,900,600.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (l) The appropriation for University of Michigan ? Dearborn is $31,722,500.00, $31,048,000.00 for operations, $465,700.00 for operations increase, and $208,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$32,662,700.00, $31,513,700.00 for operations, $954,700.00 for operations increase, and $194,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (m) The appropriation for University of Michigan ? Flint is $26,695,600.00, $26,013,500.00 for operations, $390,200.00 for operations increase, and $291,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$27,684,500.00, $26,403,700.00 for operations, $799,900.00 for operations increase, and $480,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (n) The appropriation for Wayne State University is $227,735,900.00, $223,950,900.00 for operations, $3,359,300.00 for operations increase, and $425,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$234,673,800.00, $227,310,200.00 for operations, $6,886,500.00 for operations increase, and $477,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (o) The appropriation for Western Michigan University is $121,845,400.00, $119,440,200.00 for operations, $1,791,600.00 for operations increase, and $613,600.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.$125,662,000.00, $121,231,800.00 for operations, $3,672,800.00 for operations increase, and $757,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (3) The amount appropriated in subsection (2) for public universities is $1,740,316,000.00, $1,793,846,100.00, appropriated from the following: (a) State school aid fund, $443,168,300.00.$558,668,300.00. (b) State general fund/general purpose money, $1,297,147,700.00.$1,235,177,800.00. (4) The amount appropriated for Michigan public school employees' retirement system reimbursement is $0.00. (5) The amount appropriated for state and regional programs is $316,800.00, $322,100.00, appropriated from general fund/general purpose money and allocated as follows: (a) Higher education database modernization and conversion, $200,000.00. (b) Midwestern Higher Education Compact, $116,800.00.$122,100.00. (6) The amount appropriated for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez - Rosa Parks program is $2,691,500.00, appropriated from general fund/general purpose money and allocated as follows: (a) Select student support services, $1,956,100.00. (b) Michigan college/university partnership program, $586,800.00. (c) Morris Hood, Jr. educator development program, $148,600.00. (7) Subject to subsection (8), the amount appropriated for grants and financial aid is $542,453,600.00, $551,953,600.00, allocated as follows: (a) State competitive scholarships, $19,930,900.00.$10,930,900.00. (b) Tuition grants, $41,522,700.00.$16,522,700.00. (c) Tuition incentive program, $93,800,000.00.$122,300,000.00. (d) Children of veterans and officer's survivor tuition grant programs, $2,000,000.00. (e) Project GEAR-UP, $3,200,000.00. (f) Michigan achievement scholarships, $330,000,000.00. $345,000,000.00. From this amount, up to $10,000,000.00 may be used to award skills scholarships under section 248a. (g) Michigan reconnect, $52,000,000.00. (8) The money appropriated in subsection (7) for grants and financial aid is appropriated from the following: (a) Federal revenues under the United States Department of Education, Office of Elementary and Secondary Education, GEAR-UP program, $3,200,000.00. (b) Postsecondary scholarship fund, $330,000,000.00.$345,000,000.00. (c) State general fund/general purpose money, $209,253,600.00.$203,753,600.00. (d) At the close of the fiscal year, state general fund/general purpose money appropriated in subsection (7) for grants and scholarships that is unspent must be deposited into the postsecondary scholarship fund created in section 236j. (9) For fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 only, in addition to the allocation under subsection (4), from the appropriations described in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $8,500,000.00 $7,600,000.00 for payments to participating public universities, appropriated from the state school aid fund. A public university that receives money under this subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting the normal cost contribution rate. As used in this subsection, "participating public universities" means public universities that are a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that pay contributions to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the state fiscal year. (10) For Subject to section 236m, for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $1,000,000.00 $33,409,400.00 is appropriated from the state general fund/general purpose money for Michigan Transfer Pathways. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall use funds appropriated under this subsection to work with the Michigan Transfer Network, community colleges, public universities, and other institutions of higher education in this state to facilitate the transfer of students and acceptance of credits among these institutions. The department may hire limited time FTEs or external consultants with the funds. The funds allocated under this subsection for fiscal year 2024-2025 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds remaining at the end of fiscal year 2024-2025 are carried forward into fiscal year 2025-2026, and any unexpended funds remaining at the end of fiscal year 2025-2026 are carried forward into fiscal year 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project is to support transfer pathways at postsecondary institutions in this state. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2027.school aid fund for infrastructure, technology, equipment, maintenance, and safety grants. (11) For fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $980,000.00 $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from the state general fund/general purpose money for the FAFSA completion incentive. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall use funds appropriated under this subsection to run a promotional activity to promote completing the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) for the first time consistent with the promotional-activity exception provided for in section 372(2) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.372. The promotional activity must offer prize funds that are available to a number, chosen by the department, of randomly selected Michigan residents who satisfactorily demonstrate to the department that they have completed the FAFSA for the first time. (12) For Subject to section 241f, for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $750,000.00 $15,000,000.00 is appropriated from state general fund/general purpose money to Western Michigan University to support the Project Clean program.for the Michigan student loan refinance program. (13) For Subject to section 236s, for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $70,000.00 $2,500,000.00 is appropriated from state general fund/general purpose money to a city with a population between 70,000 and 80,000 in a county with a population between 225,000 and 275,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census for investments to improve safety on the campus of a public university based in that city.for the Michigan reconnect grant program short-term training grants. (14) For fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 only, subject to section 236r, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $200,000.00 $2,000,000.00 is appropriated from the state general fund/general purpose money for an education performance study.school aid fund to Wayne State University to support costs related to the Michigan Area Health Education Center. (15) All of the following apply for fiscal year 2024-2025 only: (a) In addition to the allocations under subsections (4) and (9), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for payments to participating public universities, appropriated from the state school aid fund. A public university that receives money under this subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of payments toward the pension and other postemployment benefit unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities associated with members and pension recipients of those participating public universities. (b) The amount allocated in subdivision (a) must be allocated to each participating public university based on each participating public university's percentage of the total combined payrolls of the universities' employees who are members of the retirement system and who were hired before January 1, 1996 and the universities' employees who would have been members of the retirement system on or after January 1, 1996, but for the enactment of 1995 PA 272 for all public universities that are participating public universities for the immediately preceding state fiscal year. (c) Participating public universities receiving funds under this subsection shall forward an amount equal to the amount allocated under subdivision (a) to the retirement system in a form, manner, and time frame determined by the retirement system. (d) Amounts allocated in subdivision (a) must be paid to participating public universities in 1 lump-sum installment no later than October 31, 2024. (e) As used in this subsection, "participating public universities" means public universities that are reporting units of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that pay contributions to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the state fiscal year. (15) For fiscal year 2025-2026 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $500,000.00 is appropriated from state general fund/general purpose money and $500,000.00 is appropriated from the state school aid fund to Western Michigan University to support the electronic health records project undertaken by the college of health and human services. (16) For fiscal year 2025-2026 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from state general fund/general purpose money to Grand Valley State University to support costs related to the competency-based education incubator. Sec. 236c. In addition to the funds appropriated for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 in section 236, appropriations to the department of technology, management, and budget in the act providing general appropriations for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for state building authority rent, totaling an estimated $140,195,300.00, $142,153,900.00, provide funding for the state share of costs for previously constructed capital projects for state universities. These appropriations for state building authority rent represent additional state general fund support provided to public universities, and the following is an estimate of the amount of that support to each public university: (a) Central Michigan University, $12,927,300.00.$12,914,000.00. (b) Eastern Michigan University, $6,028,200.00.$6,022,000.00. (c) Ferris State University, $9,555,800.00.$9,546,000.00. (d) Grand Valley State University, $8,622,800.00.$8,614,00.00. (e) Lake Superior State University, $2,231,300.00.$2,229,000.00. (f) Michigan State University, $16,615,000.00.$16,598,000.00. (g) Michigan Technological University, $5,787,900.00.$5,521,000.00. (h) Northern Michigan University, $8,917,700.00.$9,735,900.00. (i) Oakland University, $11,256,500.00.$11,245,000.00. (j) Saginaw Valley State University, $7,828,000.00.$7,820,000.00. (k) University of Michigan - Ann Arbor, $12,280,600.00.$14,068,000.00. (l) University of Michigan - Dearborn, $10,736,000.00.$10,725,000.00. (m) University of Michigan - Flint, $6,063,200.00.$6,057,000.00. (n) Wayne State University, $10,082,300.00.$10,072,000.00. (o) Western Michigan University, $11,262,700.00.$10,987,000.00. Sec. 236j. (1) The postsecondary scholarship fund is created in the department of treasury for the purpose of providing scholarship awards to eligible students who attend eligible postsecondary educational institutions in this state, as provided in subsection (5). (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the postsecondary scholarship fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the postsecondary scholarship fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the postsecondary scholarship fund interest and earnings from postsecondary scholarship fund investments. (3) Money in the postsecondary scholarship fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the postsecondary scholarship fund and not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department of treasury shall be is the administrator of the postsecondary scholarship fund for auditing purposes. (5) Money must be expended from the postsecondary scholarship fund only for the purpose of providing Michigan achievement scholarship awards to eligible students who attend eligible postsecondary educational institutions in this state and for other purposes described in this section. Not more than $10,000,000.00 may be used by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential annually for the purposes of outreach and marketing programs as specified in section 248.From the funds appropriated in section 236(7) for the Michigan achievement scholarship, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may use up to $5,000,000.00 annually for the purposes of outreach programs to raise awareness of the Michigan achievement scholarship and other state scholarship programs allocated in section 236(7). The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall ensure that state scholarships are well publicized and that high school students are provided information on the availability of financial aid. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may receive and expend funds received from outside sources for scholarships, marketing, or other purposes related to Michigan state scholarships. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall provide the necessary funding and staff to fully operate the programs. (6) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, $300,000,000.00 2026, $345,000,000.00 of ongoing funding and $30,000,000.00 of 1-time funding is deposited into the postsecondary scholarship fund from the state general fund/general purpose money. (7) It is the intent of the legislature that the postsecondary scholarship fund serves as the primary funding source of the Michigan achievement scholarship. To ensure the Michigan achievement scholarship provides ongoing supports for students, it is the intent of the legislature to increase annual deposits into the postsecondary scholarship fund until the fully implemented costs of the Michigan achievement scholarship are deposited annually into the postsecondary scholarship fund. (8) In addition to the appropriations in section 236, if the amount of general fund money allocated in section 236(7) 236(7)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (f) is not sufficient to fully fund the 1 or more of those awards, under section 236(7), there is appropriated from the postsecondary scholarship fund the amount necessary to fully fund those awards. The state budget director shall provide written notification to the house and senate appropriations subcommittee on higher education and the house and senate fiscal agencies prior to any additional appropriation described in this subsection. Sec. 236m. (1) Funds appropriated in section 236(10) for infrastructure, technology, equipment, maintenance, and safety grants are intended to be used for necessary improvements and deferred maintenance of public university buildings, facilities, and other physical infrastructure; necessary improvements and deferred maintenance of information technology, other technology infrastructure, and other equipment; and other purposes related to infrastructure, technology, equipment, and maintenance. A public university may also use these funds to upgrade safety and security infrastructure. These funds are not intended to be used for any other purpose than what is specified in this section. (2) Subject to subsection (3), the payment for each public university under subsection (1) must be calculated as follows: (a) 50% of the appropriation in section 236(10) must be allocated proportionally to each public university's respective share of the total amount of operations payments described in section 236(2). (b) 50% of the appropriation in section 236(10) must be allocated only to public universities that certify that the public university did not receive a capital outlay planning or construction authorization under subsection (3). Funds described in this subdivision must be allocated as follows: (i) 50% must be allocated equally to each public university receiving an allocation under this subdivision. (ii) 50% must be allocated proportionally to each public university's respective share of the total amount of operations payments described in section 236(2), for all public universities that receive an allocation under this subdivision. (3) To receive an allocation under subsection (2)(b), a public university must certify by November 15, 2025 that it did not receive an appropriation for a planning or construction authorization for a capital outlay project between January 1, 2023 and October 1, 2025. For the purpose of providing certification under this subsection, a capital outlay appropriation or authorization that adjusts only the authorized cost or scope of a previously-authorized capital outlay project does not count as a planning or construction authorization. (4) Payments to public universities under this section must be distributed in 1 lump sum to each institution with the December 16, 2025 payment described in section 241. Sec. 236s. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236(13) for the Michigan reconnect grant program short-term training grants must be used to expand the Michigan reconnect grant program short-term training grants to include eligible students who are at least 21 years old. The funds appropriated in section 236(13) must be expended to award grants, administer the program, and support the duties outlined in section 21 of the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1721. (2) Any unexpended and unencumbered funds remaining on September 30, 2026 from the amounts appropriated in section 236(13) for the Michigan reconnect grant program short-term training grants for fiscal year 2025-2026 do not lapse on September 30, 2026 but continue to be available for the purposes described in subsection (1) in the 2026-2027 and 2027-2028 fiscal years under a work project account. The use of these unexpended fiscal year 2025-2026 funds under this subsection terminates at the end of the 2027-2028 fiscal year. Sec. 239. A public university shall not use funds appropriated in section 236 for the purchase of foreign goods, or services, or both , if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods, and services, or both , are available. Preference shall must be given to goods, or services, or both , manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses if they are competitively priced and of comparable value. In addition, preference shall be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality.for which either or both of the following apply: (a) The goods, services, or both are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans and are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (b) The goods, services, or both are manufactured or provided in a facility that employs union members. Sec. 241. Subject to sections 241a, 241b, 241c, 241e, and 244, the funds appropriated in sections section 236 and 236d to public universities must be paid out of the state treasury and distributed by the state treasurer to the respective institutions in 11 equal monthly installments on the sixteenth of each month, or the next succeeding business day, beginning with October 16, 2024. 2025. Except for Wayne State University, each institution shall accrue its July and August 2025 2026 payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.2026. Sec. 241a. (1) All public universities shall submit higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) data and associated financial aid program information requested by and in a manner prescribed by the state budget director. For public universities with fiscal years ending June 30, these data must be submitted to the state budget director by October 15 of each fiscal year. Public universities with a fiscal year ending September 30 shall submit preliminary HEIDI data by November 15 and final data by December 15. (2) It is intended that accountability reporting for public universities will be streamlined through HEIDI. The state budget director and the center will work to combine the reporting requirements outlined in this subsection with the existing HEIDI collection cycle. All of the following must be reported to the house and senate fiscal agencies and the state budget director: (a) Each public university's certification of its compliance with the requirements described in subsections (4) and (5). (b) The reporting requirements described in sections 241b and 241c. (3) If a public university fails to submit HEIDI data and associated financial aid program information in accordance with the required reporting schedule, the state treasurer may withhold the monthly operations installments under section 241 236 to the public university until those data are submitted. If a public university does not comply with all of the requirements described in subsections (4) and (5) by the end of the fiscal year, the public university forfeits the amount withheld. The state budget director shall notify the chairs of the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education at least 10 days before withholding funds from any public university. (4) No later than October 15 each year, a public university shall maintain a public transparency website available through a link on its website homepage. The website must include all of the following concerning the public university: (a) The annual operating budget and subsequent budget revisions. (b) A summary of current expenditures for the most recent fiscal year for which they are available, expressed as pie charts in the following 2 categories: (i) A chart of personnel expenditures, broken into the following subcategories: (A) Earnings and wages. (B) Employee benefit costs, including, but not limited to, medical, dental, vision, life, disability, and long-term care benefits. (C) Retirement benefit costs. (D) All other personnel costs. (ii) A chart of all current expenditures the public university reported as part of its higher education institutional data inventory data under subsection (1), broken into the same subcategories in which it reported those data. (c) Links to all of the following for the public university: (i) The current collective bargaining agreement for each bargaining unit. (ii) Each health care benefits plan, including, but not limited to, medical, dental, vision, disability, long-term care, or any other type of benefits that would constitute health care services, offered to any bargaining unit or employee of the public university. (iii) Audits and financial reports for the most recent fiscal year for which they are available. (d) General fund revenue and expenditure projections for the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year. (e) A listing of all debt service obligations, detailed by project, anticipated fiscal year payment for each project, and total outstanding debt for the current fiscal year. (f) The institution's policy regarding the transferability of core college courses between community colleges and the public university. (g) A listing of all community colleges that have entered into reverse transfer agreements with the public university. (h) A dashboard or report card demonstrating the public university's performance in several "best practice" measures. The dashboard or report card must include at least all of the following for the 3 most recent academic years for which the data are available: (i) Enrollment. (ii) Student retention rate. (iii) Six-year graduation rates. (iv) Number of Pell grant recipients and graduating Pell grant recipients. (v) Geographic origination of students, categorized as in-state, out-of-state, and international. (vi) Faculty to student ratios and total public university employee to student ratios. (vii) Teaching load by faculty classification. (viii) Graduation outcome rates, including employment and continuing education. (i) An icon badge that provides statewide consistency and public visibility. For this purpose, public universities shall use the icon badge provided by the department of technology, management, and budget consistent with the icon badge developed by the department of education for K-12 school districts. It must appear on the front of each public university's homepage. The size of the icon may be reduced to 150 x 150 pixels. The font size and style for this reporting must be consistent with other documents on each public university's website. (j) A collection and report of the number and percentage of all enrolled students who complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, broken out by undergraduate and graduate/professional classifications, reported to the center and posted on its website under the budget transparency icon badge. (5) No later than October 15 each year, a public university shall develop, maintain, and update a "campus safety information and resources" link, prominently displayed on the homepage of its website, to a section of its website containing, at a minimum, all of the following information: (a) Emergency contact numbers for police, fire, health, and other services. (b) Hours, locations, telephone numbers, and email contacts for campus public safety offices and title IX offices. (c) A list of safety and security services provided by the public university, including transportation, escort services, building surveillance, anonymous tip lines, and other available security services. (d) The public university's policies applicable to minors on university property. (e) A directory of resources available at the public university or surrounding community for students or employees who are survivors of sexual assault or sexual abuse. (f) An electronic copy of "A Resource Handbook for Campus Sexual Assault Survivors, Friends and Family", published in 2018. (g) Campus security policies and crime statistics pursuant to the student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-542, 104 Stat 2381. Information must include all material prepared pursuant to the public information reporting requirements under the crime awareness and campus security act of 1990, title II of the student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-542, 104 Stat 2381. Sec. 241c. (1) No later than the last business day of August each year, each public university that receives an appropriation in section 236 shall submit the amount of tuition and fees actually charged to a full-time resident undergraduate student for academic year 2024-2025 2025-2026 as part of the public university's higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) data. A public university shall report any revisions for any semester of the reported academic year to HEIDI within 15 days of being adopted. As used in this section: (a) "Fee" means any public university board-authorized fee that will be paid by more than 1/2 of all resident undergraduate students at least once during their enrollment at the public university, as described in the higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) user manual. A public university increasing a fee that applies to a specific subset of students or courses shall provide sufficient information to prove that the increase applied to that subset will not cause the increase in the average amount of board-authorized total tuition and fees paid by resident undergraduate students in the academic year to exceed the limit established in this subsection. (b) "Tuition and fee rate" means the average of full-time rates paid by a majority of students in each undergraduate class, based on an unweighted average of the rates authorized by the public university board and actually charged to students, deducting any uniformly rebated or refunded amounts, for the 2 semesters with the highest levels of full-time equated resident undergraduate enrollment during the academic year, as described in the higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) user manual. (c) "Room and board charges" means 1 or more accommodation and meal plans used by a public university to calculate the average charge reported under section 275m(1)(c). (2) Payments under section 236 for operations increase and under section 236d 236m must be made only to a public university that certifies provides the following certifications to the state budget director by the last business day of August each year: that its board did not adopt an increase in tuition and fee rates for resident undergraduate students after September 1, 2023 for the 2023-2024 academic year and that its board will not adopt an increase in tuition and fee rates for resident undergraduate students for the 2024-2025 academic year that is greater than 4.5% or $703.00, whichever is greater. For the academic year 2025-2026, the tuition and fee restraint rate for resident undergraduate students is an increase of not greater than 4.5% or $735.00, whichever is greater. It is the intent of the legislature that in the next fiscal year, the tuition and fee restraint rate will be adjusted only for the subsequent academic year. As used in this subsection: (a) "Fee" means any board-authorized fee that will be paid by more than 1/2 of all resident undergraduate students at least once during their enrollment at a public university, as described in the higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) user manual. A public university increasing a fee that applies to a specific subset of students or courses shall provide sufficient information to prove that the increase applied to that subset will not cause the increase in the average amount of board-authorized total tuition and fees paid by resident undergraduate students in the 2024-2025 academic year to exceed the limit established in this subsection. (b) "Tuition and fee rate" means the average of full-time rates paid by a majority of students in each undergraduate class, based on an unweighted average of the rates authorized by the public university board and actually charged to students, deducting any uniformly rebated or refunded amounts, for the 2 semesters with the highest levels of full-time equated resident undergraduate enrollment during the academic year, as described in the higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) user manual. (a) That the university's board did not adopt an increase in tuition and fee rates for resident undergraduate students after September 1, 2024 for the 2024-2025 academic year and that its board will not adopt an increase in tuition and fee rates for resident undergraduate students for the 2025-2026 academic year that is greater than 4.5% or $735.00, whichever is greater. For the academic year 2026-2027, the tuition and fee restraint rate for resident undergraduate students is an increase of not greater than 3.5% or $570.00, whichever is greater. (b) For academic year 2026-2027, either of the following: (i) That the university does not have a mandatory on-campus housing policy reportable under section 275m. (ii) That the university does have a mandatory on-campus housing policy reportable under section 275m, and that it will not adopt an increase in room and board charges that would cause the average charge for academic year 2026-2027 relative to academic year 2026-2027 reported under section 275m to increase by an amount exceeding 3.5% or $438.00, whichever is greater. (3) Each public university must shall certify to the state budget director by the last business day of August each year that it complies with all of the following requirements: (a) The public university participates in reverse transfer agreements described in section 286 with at least 3 community colleges in this state. (b) The public university does not and will not apply any of the following criteria when determining whether credits earned outside the public university by a student count toward a degree or certificate program offered by the public university: (i) Whether the credits were earned in a dual enrollment program that counted the credits toward high school graduation requirements. (ii) Whether the credits were earned in a course that was delivered in a high school classroom, community college classroom or campus, or another location. (iii) Whether the credits were earned in a course that was delivered online, in person, or hybrid. (iv) Whether other students enrolled in the course in which the credits were earned were enrolled in high school or counted the course toward high school graduation requirements. (c) The public university actively participates in and submits timely updates to the Michigan Transfer Network created as part of the Michigan Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions Officers transfer agreement. (4) The state budget director shall implement uniform reporting requirements to ensure that a public university receiving a payment under section 236 for operations increase and under section 236d 236m has satisfied the tuition restraint requirements of this section. The state budget director has the sole authority to determine if a public university has met the requirements of this section. Information reported by a public university to the state budget director under this subsection must also be reported to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education and the house and senate fiscal agencies. Sec. 241e. (1) Payments under section 236 for operations increase and under section 236d 236m must be made only to a public university that certifies to the state budget director or designee of the director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential by the last business day of August each year that it complies with the following: (a) The institutional best practice described in subdivision (c). (b) One or more of the institutional best practices described in subdivisions (d) to (g). (a) (c) The public university accepts the Michigan Transfer Agreement, partners with the Michigan Transfer Network, and promotes clear transfer pathways for interested students by doing all of the following: (i) Has a policy to help transfer or accept associate degrees from other accredited Michigan postsecondary education institutions. (ii) Publishes the policy described in subparagraph (i) on the institution's website in an easily accessible way and in admissions materials. (iii) Provides publicly available information on the Michigan Transfer Network, applicable transfer pathways, and financial aid available to transfer students, at no cost to the student. (iv) Begins negotiations to increase the number of reverse transfer agreements or articulation agreements and reports on the progress toward completing the agreements to the state budget director by the last business day in February. (b) (d) The public university requires all students to receive an academic degree or certificate map that outlines required course sequencing, program and institution requirements, declared minor program academic requirements, and a recommended timeline within which courses should be taken and in which specific semester or term in order to satisfy all program requirements to allow the student to graduate on time. (c) (e) The public university provides non-credit-bearing developmental or remedial courses at a reduced cost to students. (d) (f) The public university provides each degree- or certificate-seeking student with a designated, trained academic advisor to support student retention, persistence, and completion. The public university shall require students to meet with their academic advisor at least once per semester or term. (e) (g) The public university provides employees during business hours to assist prospective and current students complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid. (f) The public university has adopted a co-requisite model of academic support for gateway English and mathematics courses in which a student concurrently enrolls in a developmental education course and a gateway-level course in a subject area where the student requires remediation. The public university must ensure that not more than 10% of students assessed as being in need of developmental or remedial learning participate in a non-co-requisite developmental or remedial course. (g) The public university has a policy and process for assessing prior learning and knowledge that aligns with a student's academic program and other required coursework. The policy must include the opportunity for a student to earn credit toward a degree or certificate, must be available to all students at no cost to the student, and must be easily accessible on the public university's website and in admissions materials. (2) The state budget director or designee of the director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall implement uniform reporting requirements to ensure that a public university receiving a payment under section 236 for operations increase and under section 236d 236m has satisfied the institutional best practices requirements of this section. The state budget director or designee of the director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential has the sole authority to determine if a public university has met the requirements of this section. Information reported by a public university to the state budget director or designee of the director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential under this subsection must also be reported to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education and the house and senate fiscal agencies. (3) If a public university fails to comply with the certification requirements of this section, the state treasurer may withhold the monthly installments under section 241 to the public university until the report is submitted. If a public university does not comply with the certification requirements described in this section by the end of the fiscal year, the public university forfeits the amount withheld. Forfeited funds must lapse to the fund from which the funds were appropriated. The state budget director or designee of the director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall notify the chairs of the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education at least 10 days before withholding funds from any public university. Sec. 241f. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for the Michigan student loan refinance program must be distributed as provided in this section and section 241g. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Department" means the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) "Discharge" means to pay off a federal or nonfederal student loan and originate a new loan under the Michigan student loan refinance program created in subsection (3). (c) "Institution of higher education" means any of the following: (i) A state university described in section 4, 5, or 6 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963. (ii) A community college established under the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.1 to 389.195, or under part 25 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1601 to 380.1607. (iii) An independent nonprofit college or university in this state as described in section 1 of 1966 PA 313, MCL 390.991. (d) "Michigan refinanced student loan" means a loan issued under subsection (3) to discharge or reduce the sum of the unpaid principal, accrued unpaid interest, and unpaid late charges of a qualified student loan. (e) "Michigan student loan refinance program" means the loan refinance program created under subsection (3). (f) "Qualified borrower" means an individual who meets all of the following: (i) Has a qualified student loan. (ii) Incurred the qualified student loan to help pay school expenses for attendance at an institution of higher education. (iii) Has resided in this state for the 12 months prior to the date of the individual's application for refinancing of the qualified student loan under subsection (3). (iv) Has been current on payments on the qualified student loan for the 3 years prior to the date of the individual's application for refinancing the qualified student loan under subsection (3), and is in good standing on the qualified student loan as of that date. (g) "Qualified student loan" means a loan issued to a student under a federal student loan program supported by the federal government or a nonfederal loan issued by a lender such as a bank, savings and loan association, or credit union to help the student pay school expenses for attendance at an institution of higher education. (h) "Reduce" means to pay down the balance of a federal or nonfederal student loan until the terms described in subsection (3)(a) are met. (3) The Michigan student loan refinance program is created in the department and is to be administered by the department. On application of a qualified borrower who has a qualified student loan, the department, subject to subsection (4), may issue the borrower a loan under this section in accordance with all of the following: (a) The amount of the loan issued under this section must be at least $5,000.00 and not exceed the lesser of the following: (i) The sum of the unpaid principal, accrued unpaid interest, and unpaid late charges of the qualified student loan. (ii) $50,000.00. (b) The department shall pay the proceeds of the loan issued under this section to the lender of the qualified student loan, in order to discharge or reduce the outstanding balance of the qualified student loan described in subdivision (a)(i). (c) The interest rate for the Michigan refinanced student loan is a fixed rate applicable to all Michigan refinanced student loans issued under this section during the current fiscal year, which the department shall establish as minimally necessary to recoup the costs of the Michigan student loan refinance program, including any start-up costs incurred to implement or grow the program and to ensure the growth and ongoing sustainability of the program. (4) The total of all loans issued to a qualified borrower as Michigan refinanced student loans under subsection (3) must be at least $5,000.00 and not exceed $50,000.00. (5) Student loans originated under this section are not eligible to be discharged in bankruptcy. (6) This section does not guarantee an individual a right to the benefits provided under this section. (7) The department shall promulgate rules to implement this section under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (8) By December 1 of each year, the department shall submit a report to the state budget director, the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on community colleges and higher education, and the house and senate fiscal agencies for the preceding fiscal year that includes all of the following information: (a) The total number of Michigan refinanced student loans issued and the total amount loaned. (b) The interest rate applied to those loans. (c) The range of interest rates that were applicable to the refinanced qualified student loans. (d) Default rates on Michigan refinanced student loans. (e) The financial status of the Michigan student loan refinance program. Sec. 241g. (1) The Michigan student loan refinance fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund including repayments of loans made from the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (5) All funds in the Michigan student loan refinance fund are appropriated and available for expenditure to support the Michigan student loan refinance program created in section 241f. (6) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 only, $15,000,000.00 in state general fund/general purpose money appropriated in section 236 must be deposited into the fund to pay start-up costs incurred by the Michigan student loan refinance program. (7) Any unexpended and unencumbered funds remaining on September 30, 2026 from the amounts appropriated in section 236 for the Michigan student loan refinance program for fiscal year 2025-2026 do not lapse on September 30, 2026, but continue to be available for expenditure for the Michigan student loan refinance program in the 2026-2027 fiscal year under a work project account. Sec. 244. By October 15 of each year, a public university receiving funds in section 236 shall provide its longitudinal data system data set for the preceding academic year to the center for inclusion in the statewide P-20 longitudinal data system described in section 94a. If the state budget director finds that a university has not complied with this section, the state budget director is authorized to withhold the monthly operations installments provided to that university under section 241 until the state budget director finds that the university has complied with this section. Sec. 247. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for Michigan reconnect must be distributed and administered by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential pursuant to the Michigan reconnect grant act, 2020 PA 84, MCL 390.1701 to 390.1709, the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1711 to 390.1723, and the department's administrative procedures for Michigan reconnect. (2) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, after administering Michigan reconnect pursuant to subsection (1), the department may use any remaining funds appropriated in section 236 for Michigan reconnect for outreach, enrollment support, administration of the program, and grants to institutions of higher education or nonprofit organizations to provide support to reconnect eligible students to increase degree or credential completion. Sec. 248. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for Michigan achievement scholarships must be distributed as provided in this section and section 248a, pursuant to the administrative procedures for Michigan achievement scholarships of the department. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Cost of attendance" means expenses for a student's tuition, mandatory fees, and contact hours for the student's actual program of study; books, supplies, and equipment required for courses of instruction; housing and food costs; transportation expenses; federal student loan fees; miscellaneous expenses, including a reasonable amount for the documented cost of a personal computer, allowance for child care, or allowance for other dependent care; costs related to a disability; costs of obtaining a license, certification, or first professional credential; and reasonable costs for study abroad programs. (b) "Department" means the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (c) "Eligible institution" means a public university that receives an appropriation in section 236, a community college that receives an appropriation in section 201, a federally recognized tribal college in this state, or an independent nonprofit college or university in this state as described in section 1 of 1966 PA 313, MCL 390.991. (d) "Gift aid" includes federal Pell grants under 20 USC 1070a, tuition incentive program benefits under section 256, state tuition grants under section 252, awards received for minimum payments awarded in subsection (4), higher education expenses paid under the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1661 to 390.1679, and all other federal, state, local, or institutional aid in the form of grants, scholarships, or discounts applied toward tuition and mandatory fees. Gift aid does not include student loans, work-study awards, qualified withdrawals made from education savings accounts to pay higher education expenses pursuant to the Michigan education savings program act, 2000 PA 161, MCL 390.1471 to 390.1486, or higher education expenses paid under the Michigan education trust program pursuant to the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442. (e) "High school equivalency certificate" means that term as defined in section 4. (f) "Last-dollar payment amount" means 1 of the following: (i) For a student attending a community college or federally recognized tribal college, an amount equal to the student's tuition, mandatory fees, and contact hours for the student's actual program of study, minus all gift aid received by the student. (ii) For a student attending a public university or an independent nonprofit college or university, or for a student enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121, an amount equal to the student's individual cost of attendance, minus all gift aid received by the student. (g) "Minimum payment" means a payment for any eligible cost within the student's individual cost of attendance. The minimum payment must be awarded as a separate payment not included in the student's need-based financial aid. The minimum payment must not be reduced. (h) "SAI eligible student" means a student who has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and meets at least 1 of the following: (i) For awards made during academic year 2023-2024, has an expected family contribution of $25,000.00 or less. An individual is considered to have met the requirements of subsection (4) if the individual received the Michigan achievement scholarship in academic year 2023-2024, was determined to have an expected family contribution of $25,000.00 or less in academic year 2023-2024, and has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the subsequent award cycles. (ii) For awards made during academic year 2024-2025 or a subsequent academic year, has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and has a student aid index number of 1 of the following, as applicable: (A) For a student indicating on the student's Free Application for Federal Student Aid that the student is the only member of the student's household or the student's parents' household attending a postsecondary institution during that academic year, $30,000.00 or less. (B) For a student indicating on the student's Free Application for Federal Student Aid that the student is not the only member of the student's household or the student's parents' household attending a postsecondary institution during that academic year, the greater of the number described in sub-subparagraph (A) or guidance determined by the department. For the purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the department, in collaboration with the state budget office and the house and senate fiscal agencies, may calculate a student aid index number or may issue administrative guidance for the student aid index eligibility of students with more than 1 member of the student's household or the student's parents' household attending a postsecondary institution during that academic year. It is intended that the utilization of a student aid index instead of expected family contribution does not adversely impact the eligibility of students with multiple members of the student's household or student's parents' household attending postsecondary institutions. It is further intended that the legislature and executive branch work collaboratively to use Michigan achievement scholarship uptake and other relevant data to establish a more permanent measure of financial need for the Michigan achievement scholarship for subsequent academic years. (3) An individual must meet all of the following criteria each year to be eligible for a Michigan achievement scholarship awarded under this section: (a) Maintain residency in this state, as determined for purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid. (b) Have graduated from high school in this state with a diploma or certificate of completion or achieved a high school equivalency certificate in 2023 or after. (c) Be a full-time undergraduate student at an eligible institution, as defined by that eligible institution, and be a first-time enrollee in an eligible institution during the 2023-2024 academic year, or a subsequent academic year, within 15 24 months after high school graduation or attainment of a high school equivalency certificate or have received a Michigan achievement scholarship in a previous academic year. For the purposes of this subdivision, participation in a dual enrollment, early college, or other similar program while attending high school does not disqualify a student from being considered a first-time enrollee. (d) Maintain satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the eligible institution in which the student is enrolled. (e) Not be in default on a federal student loan. (f) Apply for all available gift aid for each academic year in which the individual applies for a Michigan achievement scholarship. (g) For a student who is enrolled at an eligible institution that is a public university or an independent nonprofit college or university, or who is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121, at an eligible institution, be an SAI eligible student. (4) The amount awarded to an eligible student at an eligible institution must equal 1 of the following, as applicable: (a) The amount awarded to an eligible student who is enrolled at an eligible institution that is a community college or federally recognized tribal college where the student is eligible for that institution's in-district tuition rate must be equal to the sum of the last-dollar payment amount. The amount awarded to an eligible student who is eligible for a federal Pell grant under 20 USC 1070a must include an additional amount of $1,000.00. (b) The amount awarded to an eligible student who is enrolled at an eligible institution that is a community college or federally recognized tribal college where the student is not eligible for that institution's in-district tuition rate must be the lesser of the last-dollar payment amount, or the in-district tuition rate. The amount awarded to an eligible student who is eligible for a federal Pell grant under 20 USC 1070a must include an additional amount of $1,000.00. (c) The amount awarded to an eligible student who is enrolled at an eligible institution that is a public university or is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121, at an eligible institution must equal the sum of following: (i) A minimum payment of $2,500.00. (ii) The lesser of $3,000.00 or the student's last-dollar payment amount. (d) The amount awarded to an eligible student at an eligible institution that is an independent nonprofit college or university must equal the sum of the following: (i) A minimum payment of $2,500.00. (ii) The lesser of $3,000.00 or the student's last-dollar payment amount. (e) Money awarded under this subsection for a Michigan achievement scholarship must be paid to the eligible institution for credit to the student's account. (5) Subject to section 248a(3)(f)(i), an eligible student may receive a Michigan achievement scholarship award under this section or section 248a for a maximum of 5 academic years, not more than 3 of which may be for attending eligible institutions that are community colleges or federally recognized tribal colleges unless the student is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121. A student may not receive an award under this section and section 248a(3)(f)(i) during the same academic year. (6) The department shall work closely with participating institutions to provide the highest level of participation and ensure that all requirements of the program are met. (7) From the funds appropriated in section 236(7) for the Michigan achievement scholarships, the department may not use more than $10,000,000.00 for the purposes of outreach programs to raise awareness of the Michigan achievement scholarship described in this section and section 248a and shall ensure that Michigan achievement scholarships are well publicized and that high school students are provided information on the program. The department may receive and expend funds received from outside sources for scholarships, marketing, or other purposes related to the Michigan achievement scholarship. The department shall provide the necessary funding and staff to fully operate the program. (7) (8) The department shall convene a workgroup to consider and advise the department on implementing policies for administering the Michigan achievement scholarship. The workgroup shall include participation from the Michigan Association of State Universities and its institutional members, the Michigan College Access Network, the Michigan Community College Association and its institutional members, the Michigan Independent Colleges and Universities and its institutional members, and any other interested stakeholders and offices as determined by the department. The workgroup shall make recommendations on packaging order, packaging structure, definitions of terms not otherwise defined in statute, and other administrative regulatory requirements as necessary to implement the Michigan achievement scholarship. (8) (9) The following reporting obligations apply to the Michigan achievement scholarship program: (a) By February 15 of each year, the department shall provide a written report, organized by eligible institution, to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director that includes the following information for the previous academic year: (i) The number of students who qualified for a Michigan achievement scholarship. (ii) The number of students who received a Michigan achievement scholarship. (iii) The average number of credits earned by students who received a Michigan achievement scholarship. (iv) The number of Michigan achievement scholarships that were canceled due to failure to maintain satisfactory academic progress as described in subsection (3)(d). (v) The number of Michigan achievement scholarships that were canceled due to a student ceasing attendance at an eligible institution. The number must not include any known transfers to another eligible institution. (vi) The number of Michigan achievement scholarships that were canceled due to a student's failure to maintain full-time status. (vii) The average Michigan achievement scholarship award per student, delineated by sector, including community colleges, tribal colleges, public universities, independent colleges and universities, and training institutions. As used in this subparagraph, "training institutions" means training institutions accepted to participate in the Michigan achievement scholarship program under section 248a. (b) Each eligible institution whose students receive awards under this section shall cooperate with the department in a timely manner to facilitate the creation of the report under subdivision (a). (9) (10) By April 1 of each year, each eligible institution shall submit a report to the department, the state budget office, and the house and senate fiscal agencies providing information as to the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-time first-time undergraduate students for the immediately preceding 2 institution fiscal years. If the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-time first-time undergraduate students in fiscal year 2023-2024 2024-2025 is less than the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-time first-time undergraduate students in fiscal year 2022-2023, 2023-2024, the institution must shall include in the report a description of any changes to the institutional financial aid during the 2 immediately preceding fiscal years. An institution's report of the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-time first-time undergraduate students pursuant to this subsection must be consistent with data most recently reported to the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System. (10) (11) For each fiscal year, an eligible institution must shall maintain and report its compliance with the following tuition restraint requirements, as applicable: (a) For an eligible institution that is a community college, the tuition restraint described in section 217b. (b) For an eligible institution that is a public university or independent nonprofit college or university, the tuition restraint described in section 241c. (11) (12) The state budget director shall implement reporting requirements to ensure that an eligible institution has satisfied the tuition restraint requirements of this section. The state budget director has the sole authority to determine if an eligible institution has met the requirements of this section. (12) (13) If an eligible institution exceeds the applicable tuition restraint level for 2 consecutive years, the state budget director may consider the institution ineligible for funding under this section in the subsequent academic year. (13) (14) If an institution is considered ineligible for funding under this section, the state budget director must shall reevaluate the status of the ineligible institution after 1 academic year. (14) (15) It is the intent of the legislature that an eligible institution will not make reductive changes to scholarship or financial aid programs offered by that eligible institution that have the goal or net effect of shifting the cost burden of those programs to the program described in this section. Sec. 254. The Subject to sections 217f and 275l, sums appropriated in section 236 for the state competitive scholarship, tuition incentive, tuition grant, Michigan reconnect, and Michigan achievement scholarship programs must be paid out of the state treasury and must be distributed to the respective institutions under a quarterly payment system as follows: (a) For the state competitive scholarship and tuition grant programs, 50% must be paid at the beginning of the state's first fiscal quarter, 30% during the state's second fiscal quarter, 10% during the state's third fiscal quarter, and 10% during the state's fourth fiscal quarter. (b) For the tuition incentive program, Michigan reconnect, and Michigan achievement scholarship, 65% must be paid at the beginning of the state's first fiscal quarter, and 35% during the state's second fiscal quarter. Sec. 263. (1) Included in the appropriation in section 236 for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for MSU AgBioResearch is $2,982,900.00 and included in the appropriation in section 236 for MSU Extension is $2,645,200.00 for Project GREEEN. Project GREEEN is intended to address critical regulatory, food safety, economic, and environmental problems faced by this state's plant-based agriculture, forestry, and processing industries. "GREEEN" is an acronym for Generating Research and Extension to Meet Environmental and Economic Needs. (2) The department of agriculture and rural development and Michigan State University, in consultation with agricultural commodity groups and other interested parties, shall develop Project GREEEN and its program priorities. Sec. 263b. Included in the appropriation in section 236 for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for MSU AgBioResearch and MSU Extension is funding for the Agricultural Climate Resiliency Program. The Agricultural Climate Resiliency Program is intended to address environmental sustainability of Michigan agriculture and promote the protection and efficient use of Michigan's water resources. Sec. 264. Included in the appropriation in section 236 for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for Michigan State University is $80,000.00 for the Michigan Future Farmers of America Association. This $80,000.00 allocation must not supplant any existing support that Michigan State University provides to the Michigan Future Farmers of America Association. Sec. 268. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, 2026, it is the intent of the legislature that funds be allocated for unfunded North American Indian tuition waiver costs incurred by public universities under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253, from the general fund. (2) By January 15 of each year, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall annually submit to the state budget director, the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education, and the house and senate fiscal agencies a report on North American Indian tuition waivers for the preceding academic year that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) The number of waiver applications received and the number of waiver applications approved. (b) For each public university submitting information under subsection (3), all of the following: (i) The number of graduate and undergraduate North American Indian students enrolled each term for the previous academic year. (ii) The number of North American Indian waivers granted each term, including to continuing education students, and the monetary value of the waivers for the previous academic year. (iii) The number of North American Indian students who receive a granted waiver for the previous academic year. (iv) The number of graduate and undergraduate students attending under a North American Indian tuition waiver who withdrew from the public university each term during the previous academic year. For purposes of this subparagraph, a withdrawal occurs when a student who has been awarded the waiver withdraws from the institution at any point during the term, regardless of enrollment in subsequent terms. (v) The number of graduate and undergraduate students attending under a North American Indian tuition waiver who successfully transfer to a 4-year public or private university, or complete a degree or certificate program, separated by degree or certificate level, and the graduation rate for graduate and undergraduate students attending under a North American Indian tuition waiver who complete a degree or certificate within 150% of the normal time to complete, separated by the level of the degree or certificate. (3) By January 1 of each year, a public university that receives an appropriation in section 236, or a tribal college receiving pass-through funds under section 269, 270, or 270c, shall provide to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential any information necessary for preparing the report detailed in subsection (2), using guidelines and procedures developed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (4) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may consolidate the report required under this section with the report required under section 223, but a consolidated report must separately identify data for public universities and data for community colleges. Sec. 269. For fiscal year 2024-2025, 2025-2026, from the amount appropriated in section 236 to Central Michigan University for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $76,300.00 $80,800.00 must be paid to Saginaw Chippewa Tribal College for the costs of waiving tuition for North American Indians under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253. It is the intent of the legislature that Saginaw Chippewa Tribal College provide the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential the necessary information for the college to be included in the report required under section 268. Sec. 270. For fiscal year 2024-2025, 2025-2026, from the amount appropriated in section 236 to Lake Superior State University for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $498,800.00 must be paid to Bay Mills Community College for the costs of waiving tuition for North American Indians under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253. It is the intent of the legislature that Bay Mills Community College provide the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential the necessary information for the college to be included in the report required under section 268. Sec. 270c. For fiscal year 2024-2025, 2025-2026, from the amount appropriated in section 236 to Northern Michigan University for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $155,200.00 $105,700.00 is to be paid to Keweenaw Bay Ojibwa Community College for the costs of waiving tuition for North American Indians under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253. It is the intent of the legislature that Keweenaw Bay Ojibwa Community College provide the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential the necessary information for the community college to be included in the report required under section 268. Sec. 275k. (1) Not later than December 1 of each year, each university that receives an appropriation in section 236 that, in the current or previous academic year, serves or has served as an authorizing body shall submit a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education, the house and senate fiscal agencies, the state budget director, and the department of education containing, at a minimum, all of the following information, as applicable: (a) A list of all of the schools currently authorized, and the following information for each school: (i) The year in which the school was authorized. (ii) The location of each school. (iii) The owner of the property at which each school is located and the physical buildings utilized by the school, as applicable. (b) A list identifying any schools that were closed or lost their authorization in the current or previous academic year. (c) A description of any new contracts for the operation of a public school academy that will operate as the successor to a public school academy that is currently being operated under a contract issued by another authorizing body that is currently performing in the bottom 5% of schools. (d) The academic performance of each school currently authorized, including whether a school is identified by the department of education as a partnership school. If a school is identified as a partnership school under this subdivision, the authorizing body must shall include a description of corrective actions in the school's partnership agreement, the duration of the partnership agreement, and an assessment of progress toward improvement. (e) The total enrollment of each school at the time of submission, the grades served, and student turnover rate compared to the previous academic year, as applicable. (f) Aggregated student enrollment data for students with an individualized education program as well as the total amount of special education cost reimbursements received by each school during the school's most recently completed fiscal year. (g) The total number of fees, reimbursements, contributions, or charges permitted under section 502(6) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502, that are assigned to each school currently authorized in a single academic year. (h) The names of the members of the board of directors of each school currently authorized and the date that each member of each board was appointed, and a description of the methodology used by the authorizing body to select members for the boards of directors for each school currently authorized by the authorizing body. (i) The name of the applicant who applied and received approval to organize each currently authorized school. (j) The list of contracts and length of their terms, with education service providers associated with each school currently authorized pursuant to section 502 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502, as applicable. The contracts described in this subdivision include, but are not limited to, those described in section 502(2)(d) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502. (k) Activities undertaken by each university to ensure that the board of directors of each school complies with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, and laws prohibiting conflicts of interest. (l) A description of the activities undertaken by the university to meet the functions of an authorizing body under section 502 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502, as applicable. (m) A financial report of the authorizing body's use of fees, reimbursements, contributions, or charges collected or retained under section 502(6) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502. This report must include all of the following, at a minimum: (i) The total amount of fees collected or retained under section 502(6) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502, by the authorizing body for the authorizing body's most recent fiscal year. (ii) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on compensation for faculty and staff employed primarily to meet the functions of an authorizing body. For the purpose of this subparagraph, an employee is presumed to be primarily employed to meet the functions of an authorizing body if that employee spends more than 50% of the employee's time on those activities. (iii) The number of positions, organized by job title, associated with expenditures reported under subparagraph (ii). (iv) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on contractual services to meet the functions of an authorizing body. (v) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on other overhead costs to meet the functions of an authorizing body. (vi) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were transferred to another operating unit within the university. (vii) The amount of funds reported under subparagraph (i) that were spent on activities other than functioning as an authorizing body, including a list of those activities and the amount associated with each activity. (n) An executive summary section that provides relevant summary data for reporting requirements under subdivisions (a) to (m). (2) A report submitted under this section must be in a format that meets accessibility standards for viewing on the internet under the Americans with disabilities act of 1990, Public Law 101-336. (3) A report submitted under this section must be published and updated through a link on the homepage of the public university's website. (4) In addition to the reporting requirements under this section, each authorizing body that receives an appropriation under section 236 shall adopt a facilities policy ensuring that any structures or other property vacated by a public school academy that ceases operation not contribute to blight in the surrounding neighborhood or community in which the school had previously operated. (5) (4) As used in this section, "authorizing body" means that term as defined in section 501 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.501. Sec. 275l. (1) Subject to subsection (2), the state treasurer shall reduce payments made under section 254 for any public university that is an authorizing body by an amount equal to the difference between the amount reported under section 275k(1)(m)(i) during the previous fiscal year and 1% times the total state school aid received by all public school academies authorized by the authorizing body during that fiscal year. The state treasurer may coordinate with the state budget office or any other state department or agency to administer this section. (2) If the calculation under subsection (1) would result in a net payment under section 254 that is a negative number, the payment under section 254 must be $0.00. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Authorizing body" means that term as defined in section 501 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.501. (b) "Total state school aid" means that term as used in section 502 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502. Sec. 275n. A student may not receive an award under a scholarship program receiving an appropriation under section 236(7) under either of the following conditions: (a) The student is enrolled in a program of study leading to a degree in theology, divinity, or religious education. (b) The student is enrolled at a college or university that does not have a board-approved policy of inclusion and non-discrimination that includes race, ethnicity, citizenship, color, religion, gender and gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, veteran status, ability status, or any other characteristic protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. Sec. 275o. (1) By December 31, 2025, each public university that receives an appropriation under section 236 shall produce a report detailing any increases, decreases, or other substantive changes to diversity, equity, and inclusion programs made after January 1, 2025. (2) If the report described in subsection (1) documents a change that could reduce access to a diversity, equity, or inclusion program for that university's students or employees, the university shall also report other efforts, programs, or resources that the university provides that would serve to mitigate any negative consequences associated with the documented program reduction. Sec. 276. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez - Rosa Parks future faculty fellowship program that is intended to increase the pool of academically or economically disadvantaged candidates pursuing faculty or administration careers in postsecondary education in this state. Preference may not be given to applicants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should encourage applications from applicants who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the graduate student, faculty, or administration populations. Each public university shall apply the percentage change applicable to every public university in the calculation of appropriations in section 236 to the amount of funds allocated to the future faculty fellowship program. (2) Each public university shall administer the program in a manner prescribed by the department of labor and economic opportunity. The department of labor and economic opportunity shall use a good-faith effort standard to evaluate whether a fellowship is in default. All of the following apply to the program: (a) By June 15 of each year, public universities shall report any anticipated unexpended or unencumbered program funds to the department of labor and economic opportunity. Encumbered funds are those funds that were committed by a fellowship agreement that is signed during the current fiscal year or administrative expenses that have been approved by the department of labor and economic opportunity. (b) Before September 1 of each year, unexpended or unencumbered funds may be transferred, under the direction of the department of labor and economic opportunity, to a future faculty fellowship program at another public university to be awarded to an eligible candidate at that public university. (c) Program allocations not expended or encumbered by September 30, 2026 2027 must be returned to the department of labor and economic opportunity so that those funds may lapse to the state general fund. (d) Not more than 5% of each public university's allocation for the program may be used for administration of the program. (e) In addition to the appropriation for fiscal year 2024-2025, 2025-2026, any revenue received during prior fiscal years by the department of labor and economic opportunity from defaulted fellowship agreements is appropriated for the purposes originally intended. Sec. 277. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez - Rosa Parks college day program that is intended to introduce academically or economically disadvantaged schoolchildren to the potential of a college education in this state. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Public universities should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the student population. (2) Individual program plans of each public university must include a budget of equal contributions from this program, the participating public university, the participating school district, and the participating independent degree-granting college. College day funds must not be expended to cover indirect costs. Not more than 20% of the university match may be attributable to indirect costs. Each public university shall apply the percentage change applicable to every public university in the calculation of appropriations in section 236 to the amount of funds allocated to the college day program. (3) Each public university shall administer the program described in this section in a manner prescribed by the department of labor and economic opportunity. Sec. 278. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez - Rosa Parks select student support services program for developing academically or economically disadvantaged student retention programs for 4-year public and independent educational institutions in this state. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the student population. (2) An award made under this program to any 1 institution must not be greater than $150,000.00, must have an award period of no more than 2 years, and must be matched on a 70% state, 30% college or university basis. (3) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall administer the program described in this section. Sec. 279. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez - Rosa Parks college/university partnership program between 4-year public and independent colleges and universities and public community colleges, which is intended to increase the number of academically or economically disadvantaged students who transfer from community colleges into baccalaureate programs in this state. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the transfer student population. (2) The grants must be made under the program described in this section to Michigan public and independent colleges and universities. An award to any 1 institution must not be greater than $150,000.00, must have an award period of no more than 2 years, and must be matched on a 70% state, 30% college or university basis. (3) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall administer the program described in this section. Sec. 280. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for each public university in section 236 is funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez - Rosa Parks visiting professors program, which is intended to increase the number of instructors in the classroom to provide role models for academically or economically disadvantaged students. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Public universities should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the student population. (2) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall administer the program described in this section. (3) The amount allocated to each public university is $11,184.00 $11,520.00 and is subject to an award period of no more than 2 years. Each public university receiving funds for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 under this section shall report to the department of labor and economic opportunity by April 15, 2025 2026 the amount of its unobligated and unexpended funds as of March 31, 2025 2026 and a plan to expend the remaining funds by the end of the fiscal year. The amount of funding reported as not being expended may be transferred, under the direction of the department, to another public university for use under this section. Sec. 281. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 for each public university in section 236 is funding under the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez - Rosa Parks initiative for the Morris Hood, Jr. educator development program, which is intended to increase the number of academically or economically disadvantaged students who enroll in and complete K-12 teacher education programs at the baccalaureate level and teach in this state. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should encourage participation from those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the teacher education student population. (2) The program described in this section must be administered by each state-approved teacher education institution in a manner prescribed by the department of labor and economic opportunity. (3) Approved teacher education institutions may and are encouraged to use select student support services funding in coordination with the Morris Hood, Jr. funding to achieve the goals of the program described in this section. Sec. 282. (1) Each institution receiving funds for fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 under section 278, 279, or 281 shall provide to the department of labor and economic opportunity by April 15, 2025 2026 the unobligated and unexpended funds as of March 31, 2025 2026 and a plan to expend the remaining funds by the end of the fiscal year. Notwithstanding the award limitations in sections 278 and 279, the amount of funding reported as not being expended will be reallocated to the institutions that intend to expend all funding received under section 278, 279, or 281. (2) Funds received for the purpose of administering programs under sections 278, 279, and 281 must not be used for direct financial aid or indirect financial aid. However, a public university may provide academic incentives to motivate participating students as approved by the department. As used in this subsection: (a) "Direct financial aid" includes, but is not limited to, scholarships, payment of tuition, stipends, and work-studies. (b) "Indirect financial aid" includes, but is not limited to, transportation, textbook allowances, child care support, and assistance with medical premiums or expenses. Sec. 283. (1) Using the data provided to the center as required by section 244 of this act, the center shall use the P-20 longitudinal data system to inform interested Michigan high schools and the public regarding the aggregate academic status of its students. The center shall work with the public universities and the Michigan Association of State Universities and in cooperation with the Michigan Association of Secondary School Principals. (2) Michigan high schools shall systematically inform the public universities about the use of information received under this section in a manner prescribed by the Michigan Association of Secondary School Principals in cooperation with the Michigan Association of State Universities. (3) The center shall conduct a review of the statewide longitudinal data system and associated data collection processes to identify strategies that would allow for the legal dissemination of student directory information for all students in grades 11 and 12 to Michigan public and independent nonprofit postsecondary institutions. The center shall collaborate with relevant stakeholders to recommend a process to share this data by June 30, 2024.2026. Sec. 284. Using data provided to the center as required by section 244 of this act, the center shall use the P-20 longitudinal data system to inform Michigan community colleges regarding the academic status of community college transfer students. The center shall work with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, the universities, and the Michigan Association of State Universities in cooperation with the Michigan Community College Association. Sec. 285. From the funds appropriated in section 236(2), public universities shall work with the state community colleges to encourage the transfer of students from the community colleges to the public universities and to facilitate the transfer of credits from the community colleges to those public universities. Each public university that receives an appropriation under section 236 shall consult with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential at least once an academic year on the policies and services the institution implements regarding transfer credits and transfer students. Sec. 286. From the funds appropriated in section 236(2), public universities shall work with community colleges in this state to implement statewide reverse transfer agreements to increase the number of students that are awarded credentials of value upon completion of the necessary credits. These statewide agreements shall enable students who have earned a significant number of credits at a community college and transfer to a baccalaureate granting institution before completing a degree to transfer the credits earned at the baccalaureate institution back to the community college in order to be awarded a credential of value. Each public university that receives an appropriation under section 236 shall consult with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential at least once an academic year on the policies and services the institution implements regarding reverse transfer agreements. Sec. 287. Not later than the first business day of January of each year, the center shall work with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to collect and publish the average cost of attendance data for full-time first-time students from the federal Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System (IPEDS) for each community college that receives an appropriation in section 201, each federally recognized tribal college in this state, each public university that receives an appropriation in section 236, and each independent nonprofit college or university in this state as described in section 1 of 1966 PA 313, MCL 390.991, using the most recently released data from IPEDS.Not later than December 1 of each year, each public university that receives an appropriation in section 236 shall provide a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director providing an itemized cost of attendance for full-time students attending that public university for the current and previous 2 academic years. Enacting section 1. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources for higher education for fiscal year 2025-2026 under article III of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1836 to 388.1891, as amended by this amendatory act, is estimated at $2,409,122,700.00 and the amount of that state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year 2025-2026 is estimated at $0.00. Enacting section 2. Sections 236d, 236f, 236n, and 236r, of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1836d, 388.1836f, 388.1836n, and 388.1836r, are repealed effective October 1, 2025. Enacting section 3. This amendatory act takes effect October 1, 2025.